Utah statutes.
10-3-902.   City engineer required to be licensed.

Each person appointed as city engineer shall be a registered professional engineer under Title 58, Chapter 22, Professional Engineers and Professional Land Surveyors Licensing Act.



Amended by Chapter 19, 2008 General Session

